test/src/morphology/V-lykata_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - lʼykätä: # Verb 'to throw / heittää, viskata, paiskata' - full paradigm
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:  lʼykkiän
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2:  lʼykkiät
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3:  lʼykkiäy
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1:  lʼykkiämmö
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2:  lʼykkiättö
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3:  lʼykätäh
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: lʼykkiä
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3:  lʼykätä

      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1:  lʼykkäin
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2:  lʼykkäit
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3:  lʼykkäi
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1:  lʼykkäimmö
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2:  lʼykkäittö
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3:  lʼykättih
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: lʼykännyh
      lʼykätä+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: lʼykätty

      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:  lʼykkiäzin
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:  lʼykkiäzit
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:  lʼykkiäs
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:  lʼykkiäzimmö
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:  lʼykkiäzittö
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:  lʼykättäs
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: lʼykkiäs
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3:  lʼykättäs

      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg1:  lʼykännyzin
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg2:  lʼykännyzit
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg3:  lʼykännys
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl1:  lʼykännyzimmö
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl2:  lʼykännyzittö
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl3:  lʼykätännys
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: lʼykännys
      lʼykätä+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3:  lʼykätännys

      lʼykätä+V+Pot+ScSg1:  lʼykännen
      lʼykätä+V+Pot+ScSg2:  lʼykännet
      lʼykätä+V+Pot+ScSg3:  lʼykännöy
      lʼykätä+V+Pot+ScPl1:  lʼykännemmö
      lʼykätä+V+Pot+ScPl2:  lʼykännettö
      lʼykätä+V+Pot+ScPl3:  lʼykätänneh
      lʼykätä+V+Pot+ConNeg: lʼykänne
      lʼykätä+V+Pot+ConNeg+ScPl3:  lʼykätänne

      lʼykätä+V+Imprt+ScSg2:  lʼykkiä
      lʼykätä+V+Imprt+ScSg3:  lʼykäkkäh
      lʼykätä+V+Imprt+ScPl1:  lʼykäkkiämmö
      lʼykätä+V+Imprt+ScPl2:  [lʼykäkkiä, lʼykäkkiättö]
      lʼykätä+V+Imprt+ScPl3:  lʼykättähes
      lʼykätä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg2: lʼykkiä
      lʼykätä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg3: lʼykäkkäh
      lʼykätä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl1: lʼykäkkiämmö
      lʼykätä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl2: lʼykäkkiä
      lʼykätä+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl3:  lʼykättähes


      lʼykätä+V+Inf: lʼykätä
      lʼykätä+V+Der/mine+Sg+Nom: lʼykkiämine
      lʼykätä+V+Der/mA+Inf+Ill: lʼykkiämäh
      lʼykätä+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: lʼykkiäi
 
 
